Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3103
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Private
Transfer Fee Obligation Act, the definitions in sections 76-3104 to 76-3108
shall be used.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 3.